Utah statutes.
42-3-1.   Commissioner of agriculture and food to register names.

Any owner of a farm in this state may have the name of his farm, together with a brief description of his lands to which such name applies, recorded in a register kept for the purpose in the office of the commissioner of agriculture and food, and the commissioner of agriculture and food shall furnish to such landowner a proper certificate setting forth such name and a brief description of such lands.  When any name shall have been so recorded it shall not be recorded as the name of any other farm.



Amended by Chapter 82, 1997 General Session

